Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-101.01
Written examination required.

The written examination required by section 64-101 shall be developed and administered by the Secretary of State and shall consist of questions relating to laws, procedures, and ethics for notaries public. All applicants for commission as a notary public on and after July 16, 2004, shall be required to take and pass the examination prior to being commissioned.

Laws 2004, LB 315, § 3.